New Jersey, session 221, A4967.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, "Advanced Clean Trucks regulations" means the portion of the California Low Emission Vehicle program that was adopted by the California Air Resources Board in 2021, and which would require manufacturers of medium-duty and heavy-duty motor vehicles to sell an increasing percentage of zero-emissions vehicles, including the provisions codified in sections 1905, 1963, and sections 1963.1 through 1963.5 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations. b.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Environmental Protection shall not implement or enforce the Advanced Clean Trucks regulations, as modified to apply to New Jersey, earlier than January 1, 2027. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.